Maine, session 132, LD1670.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §17063 is enacted to read:
§17063. Maine Public Employees Retirement System Home Repair and Energy
Upgrade Loan Program
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Energy improvement" means a residential energy efficiency improvement, an
installation of a solar collector on a residence, a purchase of an electric vehicle for
personal use or an installation of an electric vehicle charging station.
B. "Fund" means the Maine Public Employees Retirement System Home Repair and
Energy Upgrade Loan Fund established in subsection 5.
C. "Home repair" means a measure to install, repair or replace a vital housing system
or building component, including a well, well water filtration system, radon mitigation
system, electrical system, ventilation system, window, door, roof, chimney, siding or
structural component or an accessibility improvement for a person with a disability.
D. "Participant" means a member or a terminated member with a retirement allowance
granted under this chapter.
E. "Program" means the Maine Public Employees Retirement System Home Repair
and Energy Upgrade Loan Program established in subsection 2.
F. "Residential energy efficiency improvement" means a measure to enhance the
energy efficiency of a residence, including a heating system, a cooling system, a
heating and cooling system control upgrade, lighting, an appliance insulation or air
sealing.
G. "Solar collector" has the same meaning as in Title 33, section 1421, subsection 4.
2. Maine Public Employees Retirement System Home Repair and Energy
Upgrade Loan Program established. The Maine Public Employees Retirement System
Home Repair and Energy Upgrade Loan Program, administered by the retirement system,
is established. The program provides low-interest loans to participants to finance home
repairs and energy improvements. The program provides loans through disbursement from
the fund.
3. Loan parameters. A loan provided by the program to a participant:
A. Is capped at $25,000 for that participant;
B. Carries an interest rate not to exceed 2% per annum;
C. May not exceed 100% of the participant's cumulative retirement system
contributions; and
D. Has a maximum term of 10 years.
4. Loan repayment and default mitigation. A participant shall repay a loan provided
by the program through payroll deductions if the loan recipient is a member and through
pension deductions if the loan recipient is a terminated member with a retirement allowance
granted under this chapter. If the participant is terminated as an employee or defaults on a
Page 1 - 132LR2149(01)

411 loan provided through the program, the outstanding loan balance may be deducted from
422 the participant's retirement system benefits.
5. Maine Public Employees Retirement System Home Repair and Energy
Upgrade Loan Fund. The Maine Public Employees Retirement System Home Repair and
Energy Upgrade Loan Fund, administered by the retirement system, is established. The
fund is a revolving, nonlapsing, interest-bearing fund to support the program. The fund
consists of funds from allocation of retirement system portfolio funds, appropriations, other
allocations and grants, donations and contributions from other public or private sources.
Interest earned by investments of funds in the fund is credited to the fund. Funds in the
fund may only be used for making a loan through the program.
6. Reporting. By January 1st of each year, the retirement system shall report to the
Legislature the prior calendar year's program performance, including loan disbursements,
repayment rates, default rates and job creation as a result of program activities.
7. Rules. The retirement system shall adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this
section. Rules adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules under chapter
375, subchapter 2-A.
Sec. 2. Maine Public Employees Retirement System Home Repair and
Energy Upgrade Loan Fund capitalization. The Maine Public Employees
Retirement System shall capitalize the Maine Public Employees Retirement System Home
Repair and Energy Upgrade Loan Fund under the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 5, section
17063, subsection 5 by allocating annually for 10 years $25 million from the retirement
system's portfolio sourced by reallocating retirement system portfolio funds currently
invested in fossil fuel holdings, with the initial yearly allocation of $25 million allocated to
the fund upon the effective date of this Act. For purposes of this section, "fossil fuel
holding" means an investment in a company that engages in the exploration, production,
use, transportation, sale or manufacture of a fossil fuel or a fossil fuel by-product.